Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3411
Direct supervision, defined.

Direct supervision means having full professional knowledge and control over work that constitutes the practice of architecture or engineering.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 10.